North Carolina, session 2025, HB970.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 8.
"Prevention of Algorithmic Rent Fixing.
"§ 42-80. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Coordinate or coordinating function. – Any of the following with respect to a
service provider:
a. Collecting of historical or contemporaneous prices, price changes,
supply levels, occupancy rates, or lease or rental contract termination
and renewal dates of residential dwelling units from two or more real
estate lessors or from public databases.
b. Analyzing or processing of the information described in
sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision using a system, software, or
process that uses computation.
c. Recommending rental prices, lease terms, or occupancy levels to a real
estate lessor.
d. Using a pricing algorithm that uses, incorporates, or was trained with
nonpublic competitor data to set the amount of rent for a residential
dwelling unit or any other commercial term contained within a
residential rental agreement.
(2) Nonpublic competitor data. – Nonpublic data that is derived from or otherwise
provided by another person that competes in the same market as a person, or
a related market. This term does not include information distributed, reported,
or otherwise communicated in a way that does not reveal any underlying data
from a competitor, such as narrative industry reports, news reports, business
commentaries, or generalized industry survey results.
(3) Nonpublic data. – Information that is not widely available or easily accessible
to the public, including information about price, commercial terms, and
related products or services, regardless of whether the data is attributable to a
specific competitor or anonymized.
*H970-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Person. – As defined in G.S. 12-3.
(5) Pre-dispute arbitration agreement. – An agreement to arbitrate a dispute that
has not yet arisen at the time of the making of the agreement.
(6) Pre-dispute joint-action waiver. – An agreement, whether or not part of a
pre-dispute arbitration agreement that would prohibit, or waive the right of,
one of the parties to the agreement to participate in a joint, class, or collective
action in a judicial, arbitral, administrative, or other forum, concerning a
dispute that has not yet arisen at the time of the making of the agreement.
(7) Pricing algorithm. – Any process using calculations that analyzes data for the
purpose of recommending or setting prices or commercial terms, including
processes that utilize machine learning or other artificial intelligence
techniques.
(8) Real estate lessor. – Any individual, corporation, partnership, association,
joint-stock company, trust, or unincorporated organization that owns and
leases real property or any portion thereof in the form of a residential dwelling
unit.
(9) Residential dwelling unit. – Any house, apartment, accessory unit, or other
housing unit intended to be used as a person's primary residence. This term
does not include inpatient medical care, licensed long-term care, or detention
or correctional facilities.
(10) Service provider. – A person that provides a coordinating function for a real
estate lessor.
"§ 42-81. Unlawful coordination.
(a) It is unlawful for any real estate lessor, or any agent or subcontractor of a real estate
lessor, within North Carolina to subscribe to, contract for, or otherwise exchange anything of
value in return for coordinating functions.
(b) It is unlawful for any service provider to facilitate an agreement to not compete among
real estate lessors with respect to residential dwelling units within the State of North Carolina.
"§ 42-82. Enforcement.
(a) A violation of any provision of this Article constitutes an unfair or deceptive trade
practice under G.S. 75-1.1. Any party aggrieved by a violation of this Article may bring a cause
of action against the real estate lessor or service provider, as appropriate, and is entitled to the
relief available in Chapter 75 of the General Statutes. The Attorney General is hereby empowered
to enforce this Article as allowed by Chapter 75 of the General Statutes.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, at the election of the person alleging
conduct constituting a violation of this section, or the named representative of a class in a
collective action alleging such conduct, no pre-dispute arbitration agreement or pre-dispute
joint-action waiver shall be valid or enforceable with respect to a case which relates to a violation
of this Article."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to acts or
omissions occurring on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 970-First Edition